Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
37C]

STATE DEBT

Part I. State Debt Management Policy

Section

37C-1 State debt management policy;
establishment

37C-2 Recommended debt management policy;
parameters

37C-3 Debt management policy; duties of the
legislature

Part II. Debt Affordability Study

37C-11 Definitions

37C-12 Debt affordability study

37C-13 Debt affordability study; purpose,
information

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next